Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4015
Fee; when not applicable.

The fee imposed by section 2-4012 shall not apply to the sale of grain sorghum to the federal government for ultimate use or consumption by the people of the United States when the State of Nebraska is prohibited from imposing such fee by the Constitution of the United States and laws enacted pursuant thereto.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 15.